Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1908
Polygraph examiner, defined.

Polygraph examiner shall mean any person, other than an intern, who uses an approved polygraph to test or question an examinee for the purpose of attempting to determine truth or deception.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 8.